Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,177
Act, how cited.

Sections 85-9,177 to 85-9,182 shall be known and may be cited as the Student Diversity Scholarship Program Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1379, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB342, § 32.